Alaska statutes. Title 28. Motor Vehicles.
Chapter 32. Commercial Motor Vehicle Safety Citations.

Sec. 28.32.010.
Commercial motor vehicle safety citations.

[Repealed, § 16 E.O. 98 (1997). For current law, see AS

19.10.310

.]

A peace officer, or an employee of the Department of Public Safety who is authorized by the commissioner of that department to enforce both hazardous materials and commercial vehicle safety regulations, may issue a citation under AS

12.25.175

—

12.25.230

to a person who violates a regulation adopted under AS

28.05.011(a)(2)

. An employee of the Department of Public Safety who is authorized by the commissioner of public safety to enforce both hazardous materials and commercial vehicle safety regulations may not take a person into custody under AS

12.25.180(b)

.

History.

(§ 3 ch 104 SLA 1985; am § 1 ch 109 SLA 1990; am E.O. No. 98 § 16 (1997); am E.O. No. 99 § 49 (1997); am § 40 ch 29 SLA 2010)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2010 amendment, effective July 1, 2010, substituted “AS

12.25.175

—

12.25.230

” for “AS

12.25.180

—

12.25.230

”.

Editor’s notes. —

Under § 61, ch. 29, SLA 2010, the 2010 amendment of (b) of this section applies “to all citations issued . . . for violations occurring on or after July 1, 2010.”

Sec. 28.32.020.
Exemptions. [Repealed, § 3 ch 109 SLA 1990.]

Secs. 28.32.030 — 28.32.900.
[Repealed, § 16 E.O. 98 (1997). For current law, see AS 19.10.340 — 19.10.399.]